West Virginia, session 2025, SB367.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 6, 2024, authorized under the authority of §19-1-3b of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 16, 2024, relating to the Department of Agriculture (employment reference and inquiries and background checks, 61 CSR 20), is authorized.